Oklahoma, session 2025, SB191.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 427.21, as


amended by Section 2, Chapter 329, O.S.L. 2022 (63 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 427.21), is amended to read as follows:


Section 427.21. A. A medical marijuana business shall not


engage in advertising that is deceptive, false or misleading.


B. Medical marijuana advertising shall not contain any


statement or illustration that:


1. Promotes overconsumption;


2. Represents that the use of marijuana has curative or


therapeutic effects or the ingestion of marijuana is safe or


harmless; or

Req. No. 1312 Page 1


3. Markets flavored medical marijuana products in a way that


suggests they are healthier alternatives to medical marijuana; or


4. Depicts a child or other person under legal age to consume


marijuana, or includes:


a. objects such as toys or cartoon or other characters,


which suggest the presence of a child, or any other


depiction designed in any manner to be especially


appealing to children or other persons under legal age


to consume marijuana including, but not limited to,


flashing signs, flags, banners, or tube men on the


premises of the dispensary, or


b. any manner or design that would be especially


appealing to children or other persons under eighteen


(18) years of age including, but not limited to,


depictions of improved social status, physical


appearance, or athletic performance, or


c. discounts or coupons for the purchase of medical


marijuana products.


C. Upon the effective date of this act November 1, 2022, all


medical marijuana commercial grower licensees shall be required to


post signage at the site of the commercial grow operation. Signage


shall be located at the perimeter of the property with dimensions


measuring no less than eighteen (18) inches by twenty-four (24)


inches with a font size of no less than two (2) inches. Information

Req. No. 1312 Page 2


required to be displayed on the sign shall be in black standardized


font on a white background. The Oklahoma Medical Marijuana


Authority shall promulgate rules as necessary regarding the size,


placement, issuance and specifications of the required signage. The


following information shall be included on the required signage:


1. Business name;


2. Physical address of the licensed business;


3. Phone number of the licensed business; and


4. Medical marijuana business license number.


The required signage shall also comply with county regulations


and local ordinances related to the real property where the


commercial grow operation is located. Failure to erect the proper


signage within sixty (60) days after the renewal of each application


for a medical marijuana commercial grower license in accordance with


the provisions of this subsection shall result in the immediate


revocation of the medical marijuana commercial grower license. Upon


issuance of a temporary license, all medical marijuana commercial


grower licensees shall be required to comply with the provisions of


this subsection prior to the prelicensure inspection conducted by


the Authority.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1312 CAD 12/30/2024 2:01:36 PM



Req. No. 1312 Page 3